Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB66.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 12.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of this section, "minority" means American Indian; Alaskan native;
African-American; Hispanic, including persons of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban,
and Central or South American origin; Pacific islander; or other ethnic group
underrepresented on state boards and commissions.
(2) Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, the members of each administrative
board or commission shall be citizens of Kentucky appointed by the Governor from
the state at large on the basis of their interests in public affairs, their good judgment,
and their knowledge and ability in the field of action of the department for which
appointed, with a view to providing diversity of interests and points of view in the
membership and without regard to their political or religious opinions or
affiliations.
(3) Where appointments to administrative boards and commissions are made from lists
submitted to him or her, the Governor may reject the list and require that other lists
be submitted. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, in the event the
current membership of a board or commission reflects a proportion of the minority
group less than the proportion of the minority group in the total population of the
Commonwealth, then the Governor may appoint a member of the minority group
even if the list of nominees for a vacancy does not include a member of the
minority group.
(4) Before entering upon the duties of their office, all members of administrative
boards and commissions shall take the oath of office prescribed by Section 228 of
the Constitution of Kentucky.
(5) (a) A board, commission, or similar administrative body may conduct video
teleconference meetings in accordance with Section 2 of this Act to allow
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 10/2/2025 2:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 79
members of the public to attend and participate.
(b) 1. A member of a board, commission, or similar administrative body may
attend a meeting virtually through video teleconference unless a
decision of the board, commission, or similar administrative body at
the meeting:
a. Would result in an action that implements, interprets, or
prescribes law or policy or affects private rights or procedures
available to the public; or
b. Administers or awards funds.
2. Members who attend a meeting virtually through video teleconference
shall not receive reimbursement for travel expenses.
(6) When a board, commission, or similar administrative body is established and no
provision is made for compensation of members, members shall serve without pay,
but may receive reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses.
Section 2. KRS 61.826 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A public agency may conduct any meeting through video teleconference.
(2) Notice of a video teleconference meeting shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of KRS 61.820 or 61.823 as appropriate;
(b) Clearly state that the meeting will be a video teleconference;
(c) Provide specific information on how any member of the public or media
organization may view the meeting electronically; and
(d) In any case where the public agency has elected to provide a physical
location, or in any circumstance where two (2) or more members of the public
agency are attending a video teleconference meeting from the same physical
location, precisely identify a primary physical location of the video
teleconference where all members can be seen and heard and the public may
attend in accordance with KRS 61.840.
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 10/2/2025 2:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 79
(3) The same procedures with regard to participation, distribution of materials, and
other matters shall apply in all video teleconference locations. Members of the
public agency who participate in a video teleconference shall remain visible on
camera at all times that business is being discussed.
(4) Any interruption in the video or audio broadcast of a video teleconference at any
location shall result in the suspension of the video teleconference until the broadcast
is restored.
(5) If a regular meeting is changed to a video conference, the meeting shall remain a
regular meeting if the meeting occurs on the same date and time as originally
scheduled and the public agency follows the provisions of KRS 61.823(4) to
provide a notice that meets the requirements of subsection (2)(b) to (d) of this
section.
(6) A member of a public agency who participates in a video teleconference meeting
or attends a regular meeting virtually through video teleconference shall not
receive reimbursement for travel expenses.
Section 3. KRS 164.004 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education is hereby created and
established. The committee shall be composed of members appointed by the
Council on Postsecondary Education, the Governor, and the General Assembly. The
council's representatives shall consist of the chair of the council, the president of the
council, and five (5) members of the council designated by the chair. The
Governor's representatives shall consist of the Governor and six (6) persons
designated by the Governor. The General Assembly's representatives shall consist
of the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the
Majority and Minority Floor Leaders of both chambers of the General Assembly,
the minority caucus chair of each chamber, a member appointed by the President of
the Senate, a member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, a
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 10/2/2025 2:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 79
member appointed by the Minority Floor Leader of the Senate, a member appointed
by the Minority Floor Leader of the House of Representatives, and the chair of the
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue of each chamber.
(2) The chair of the council shall serve as chair of the committee. The committee shall
meet at least quarterly and at other times upon the written call of the chair or of
majorities of any two (2) of the three (3) groups that compose the committee.
(3) Nonlegislative members of the committee shall serve without compensation but
shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, as set forth in KRS
12.070(5) and (6). Committee members who are Kentucky legislators shall be
compensated for attendance at committee meetings from the legislative branch
budget bill and as set forth in KRS 6.190.
(4) The committee shall serve as a forum for the council and the elected leadership of
the Commonwealth to exchange ideas about the future of postsecondary education
in Kentucky.
(5) The council shall periodically review its strategic implementation plan for the
strategic agenda under KRS 164.0203 and advise the committee of the actions
necessary to meet the goals established in KRS 164.003(2). The elected leaders
shall review and comment on the strategic agenda and the timetable for
implementation.
(6) The Governor shall advise the committee about the financial condition of the
Commonwealth and the probable funds the executive branch intends to recommend
to the General Assembly to be appropriated for postsecondary education.
(7) The legislative members shall react to the comments of the council and the
Governor.
(8) The council shall advise the committee about its opinion of how the postsecondary
education funds projected to be available should be allocated based on priorities and
projected resources. Nothing in this section shall be construed to infringe upon the
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 10/2/2025 2:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 79
Governor's duty under KRS 48.100 to recommend appropriations to the General
Assembly or upon the General Assembly's power to make final appropriations in
the enacted budget.
(9) The committee shall have the advisory authority not explicitly prohibited by law
that is necessary to carry out and effectuate its advisory functions, duties, and
responsibilities, including the following:
(a) Receive reports from the council on the development and implementation of
the long-term strategic agenda, including biennial budget requests for
postsecondary education and any subsequent and related budget requests;
(b) Review the council's proposed objectives and benchmarks for the next fiscal
biennium for furthering the Commonwealth's achievement of the goals set out
in KRS 164.003(2);
(c) Consider and advise the council on the general budget parameters regarding
development of the postsecondary budget for the next fiscal biennium;
(d) Review biennial budget requests from the council for the next fiscal biennium
including base funding, increases in base funding, and funding for a strategic
investment and incentive funding program, including criteria to be used in
allocating these funds to institutions;
(e) Receive from the council, at least annually and on a more frequent basis if
requested by the committee, accountability reports, budget information, and
other information the committee deems proper; and
(f) Serve as the search committee for the review and consideration of candidates
to be presented to the council for the initial appointment to the position of
president of the Council on Postsecondary Education. Each group of the
committee shall have one (1) vote on the search committee. The vote of each
group shall be determined by a majority of the members of that group.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 10/2/2025 2:44 PM Jacketed